Illinois, session 104th, HB3523.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 524-8.2 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/24-8.2 new)7    Sec. 24-8.2. Minimum salary.8    (a) As used in this Section, "employee" means an employee 9of the school district who provides educational support 10services to the district, including, but not limited to, a 11custodial employee, a transportation employee, a food service 12provider, a classroom assistant, administrative staff, or a 13paraprofessional under subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of 14Section 21B-20.15    (b) In fixing the salaries of employees, a school board 16shall pay to employees an hourly rate of not less than: (i) $20 17for the 2026-2027 school year; (ii) $21 for the 2027-2028 18school year; and (iii) $22 for the 2028-2029 school year. The 19minimum hourly rate for each school year thereafter shall 20equal the minimum hourly rate for the previous school year 21increased by a percentage equal to the percentage increase, if 22any, in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for 23all items published by the United States Department of Labor   HB3523- 2 -LRB104 10377 LNS 20452 b1for the previous school year.  2    Section 10. The Public Higher Education Act is amended by 3adding Section 20 as follows: 4    (110 ILCS 167/20 new)5    Sec. 20. Minimum salary.6    (a) As used in this Section, "employee" means an employee 7of a public institution of higher education who provides 8educational support services to the institution, including, 9but not limited to, a custodial employee, a transportation 10employee, a food service provider, a teaching assistant, or 11administrative staff.12    (b) In fixing the salaries of employees, the governing 13board of each public institution of higher education shall pay 14to employees an hourly rate of not less than: (i) $20 for the 152026-2027 academic year; (ii) $21 for the 2027-2028 academic 16year; and (iii) $22 for the 2028-2029 academic year. The 17minimum hourly rate for each academic year thereafter shall 18equal the minimum hourly rate for the previous academic year 19increased by a percentage equal to the percentage increase, if 20any, in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for 21all items published by the United States Department of Labor 22for the previous academic year. 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.